Montana, session 2025, SB526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Community health aide provider education grant program –
eligibility – recipient reporting – administration – reports to the legislature. (1) There is a community
health aide provider education grant program administered by the commissioner of higher education. The
purpose of the grant program is to develop, implement, and maintain education programs for community health
aide or dental health aide providers.
(2) The community health aide provider education grant program must involve the development of
a community health aide or dental health aide provider education program that qualifies graduates to practice
within the scope authorized under 25 U.S.C. 1616l.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 526

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 526.1
(3) A tribal college located in the state may apply for a grant to:
(a) expand or maintain an existing education program for community health aide or dental health
aide providers; or
(b) develop a new education program for community health aide or dental health aide providers.
(4) (a) It is the intent of the legislature that the commissioner award grants in the following
amounts:
(i) a one-time amount of up to $1 million to a recipient for startup costs for developing a new
provider education program; and
(ii) an amount of up to $500,000 to a recipient each year, reoccurring for up to 4 years, for the
ongoing maintenance of the program as well as for data collection and reporting in accordance with subsection
(5).
(b) The maximum total amount a recipient may receive under the community health aide provider
education grant program is $ 3 million.
(c) Funding preference may be given to tribal colleges with experience with either community
health aide or dental health aide provider education programs.
(5) A tribal college awarded a grant under this section shall evaluate the impact of the use of
community health aide and dental health aide providers on the delivery of and access to primary care or
primary oral health care. Grantees shall report to the commissioner on the outcomes of a program supported by
the grant program including, at minimum:
(a) the number of annual graduates of the community health aide or dental health aide program;
(b) the number of community health aide or dental health aide providers annually certified by the
appropriate federal certification board;
(c) the settings where certified community health aide and dental health aide providers are
practicing and the patient populations and tribes served;
(d) in collaboration with tribal health clinics, the cost-effectiveness of community health aide and
dental health aide providers; and
(e) population health data describing the effectiveness of community health aide and dental health
aide providers in improving access to primary care and primary oral health care, including:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 526

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 526.1
(i) numbers and service categories of patients served compared to years without community
health aide or dental health aide providers;
(ii) types of health care services provided by clinics employing community health aide and dental
health aide providers;
(iii) utilization data for local emergency medical services;
(iv) chronic care disease management data;
(v) medicaid utilization;
(vi) numbers of new patients served;
(vii) clinic wait time trends; and
(viii) distances traveled by patients to receive care.
(6) The commissioner shall create and administer a grant program that meets the goals and
requirements of this section. The commissioner shall utilize the data reported under subsection (5) and shall
submit an annual report on the administration and outcomes of the program to the education interim committee
and to the children, families, health, and human services interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Allocation. (1) There is allocated $1.5 million from the general fund to
the commissioner of higher education for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes described in
[section 1].
(2) The legislature intends that the allocation in this section be considered part of the ongoing base
for the next legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 25, part 4, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 25, part 4, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 526

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 526.1
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 526